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DTC P2757 Torque Converter Clutch Pressure Control Solenoid
Performance(Shift Solenoid Valve SLU)

SYSTEM DESCRIPTION
The Engine and ECT ECU uses the signals from the Throttle
position Sensor and Air−flow Meter to monitor the engagement
condition of the lock−up clutch.
Then the Engine and ECT ECU compares the engagement
condition of the lock−up clutch with the lock−up schedule in the
Engine and ECT ECU memory to detect mechanical trouble of
the shift solenoid valve SLU, valve body, torque converter and
automatic transmission assembly (clutch, brake or gear etc.).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P2757

Lock−up does not occur when driving in the lock−up range
(normal driving at 80 km/h [ 50 mph] ), or lock−up remains ON
in the lock−up OFF range.
(2−trip detection logic)

S Shift solenoid valve SLU is stuck open or closed
S Valve body blocked up or stuck
S Lock−up clutch
S Automatic transmission assembly

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check shift solenoid valve SLU operation.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve SLU.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of so-

lenoid connector.
Standard: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

(b) Connect the positive (+) lead with an 21 W bulb to terminal
2 of solenoid connector and negative (−) lead to terminal
1 of the solenoid valve connector, then check the move-
ment of the valve.
Standard: Solenoid sounds operation noise.

OK:
Standard

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve SLU
(See page AT−8) .

OK
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2 Check valve body (See page DI−26).

NG Replace the valve body (See page AT−8) .

OK

3 Check torque converter (See page AT−43).

OK Repair or replace transmission (See page
AT−31).

NG

Replace the torque converter
(See page AT−31).


